en: Yuzu jams
fr: Confitures de Yuzu

en: Fruit jellies, jellies, jelly
bg: Желе
cs: Rosolem
da: Gelé
de: Fruchtgelees
el: ζελέ
es: Jaleas de frutas, Jalea
et: Želee
fi: hedelmähyytelöt, Hyytelö
fr: Gelées de fruits, Gelées, gelée
hr: Žele
hu: zselé
it: Gelatine di frutta
ja: フルーツゼリー
lt: Žele
lv: Želeja
mt: ġelatina
nl: Vruchtengeleien, Gelei
pl: Galaretka
pt: Geleias de fruta, Geleia
ro: Jeleul
sk: Rôsol
sl: Žele
sv: Fruktgeléer, Gelé

en: extra fruit jellies, extra jellies, extra jelly
bg: желе екстра качество
cs: rosolu výběrového, rosolu extra
da: gelé ekstra
de: Gelee extra
el: ζελέ έξτρα
es: jalea extra
et: Ekstra želee
fi: Erikoishyytelön
fr: gelées extra, gelée extra
hr: ekstra želea
hu: extrazselé
it: gelatina extra
lt: aukščiausios rūšies žele
lv: augstākā labuma želeju
mt: ġelatina extra
nl: extra gelei
pl: galaretki ekstra
pt: geleia extra
ro: jeleului de calitate superioară
sk: extra rôsolu
sl: ekstra želeju
sv: extra gelé

en: Apples jellies
de: Apfel Gelees
fi: Omenahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de pommes
hr: Žele od jabuka
ja: りんごゼリー
pt: Geleias de maçã
sv: Äpplegeléer

en: Beer jellies
fr: gelées de bière

en: Blackberry jellies
de: Brombeere Gelees
es: Jaleas de moras
fi: Karhunvatukkahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de mûres
hr: Žele od kupina
ja: ブラックベリーゼリー
nl: Zwarte bessengeleien
sv: Björnbärsgeléer

en: Blackcurrant jellies, Blackcurrants jellies
de: Schwarze Johannisbeere Gelees
fi: Mustaherukkahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de cassis
hr: Žele od crnog ribiza
sv: Svartvinbärsgeléer, Svartvinbärsgelé

en: Elderberry jellies
es: Jaleas de saúco negro
fi: Seljanmarjahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de sureau noir
hr: Žele od bazge
ja: エルダーベリーゼリー
nl: Vlierbessengeleien
sv: Fläderbärsgeléer

en: Guavas jellies
de: Guave Gelees
es: Jaleas de guayaba
fi: Guava-hyytelöt
fr: Gelées de goyave
hr: Žele od guave
ja: グァバゼリー
nl: Guavegeleien
pt: Geleias de goiaba
sv: Guavageléer

en: Lemon jellies
de: Zitrone Gelees
es: Jaleas de limón
fi: Sitruunahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de citron
hr: Žele od limuna
ja: レモンゼリー
nl: Citroengeleien
pt: Geleias de limão
sv: Citrongeléer

en: Myrtles jellies
fr: Gelées de myrtes

en: Passion fruit jellies, Passionfruit jellies
de: Passionsfrucht Gelees
es: Jaleas de maracuyá, Jaleas de frutas de la pasión
fi: Passiohedelmähyytelöt, Passionhedelmähyytelöt
fr: Gelées de fruits de la passion, Gelées de maracudja
hr: Žele od marakuje
ja: パッションフルーツゼリー
nl: Passievruchtgeleien
pt: Geleias de maracujá
sv: Passionsfruktgeléer

en: Quince jellies
de: Quitten Gelees, Quitten-Gelee
fi: Kvittenihyytelöt
fr: Gelées de coings
hr: Žele od dunja
nl: Kweepeergeleien
pt: Geleias de marmelo
sv: Kvittengeléer

en: Raspberry jellies
de: Himbeere Gelees
fi: Vadelmahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de framboises
hr: Žele od malina
ja: ラズベリーゼリー
nl: Frambozengeleien
pt: Geleias de framboesa
sv: Hallongeléer

en: Redcurrants jellies
de: Rote Johannisbeere Gelees
es: Jaleas de grosellas
fi: Punaherukkahyytelöt
fr: Gelées de groseilles
hr: Žele od crvenog ribiza
nl: Aalbessengeleien
pt: Geleias de groselha
sv: Vinbärsgeléer

en: Sea-buckthorn jellies
de: Sanddorn Gelees
fi: Tyrnihyytelöt
fr: Gelées d'argousiers
hr: Žele od krkavine

en: Wine jellies, wine gelees
fr: Gelées de vin
hr: Vinski želei
pt: Geleias de vinho

en: Chestnut spreads, Chestnut purees, Creme de marrons, Cremes de marrons, Chestnut jams, Chestnut cream, Sweetened chestnut purée
bg: Подсладено пюре от кестени
cs: Kaštanovým krémem
da: Kastanjecreme
de: Maronenkrem
el: κρέμα κάστανου
es: Cremas de castañas, Mermeladas de castañas, Confituras de castañas, Cremas de marron glacé, Purés de castaña, Crema de castañas
et: Magustatud kastanipüree
fi: kastanjalevitteet, Makeutettu kastanjasose
fr: Crèmes de marrons, Purées de marrons, Confitures de châtaignes, Confitures de marrons, Crémes de marrons glacés, Crème de chataignes, Crèmes de chataignes, Crème de marrons
hr: Zaslađeni kesten pire
hu: cukrozott gesztenyekrém
it: Creme di marroni, Crema di marroni
lt: Kaštonų sviestai, Saldinta kaštonų tyrė
lv: Saldināts kastaņu biezenis
mt: Purejiet tal-qastan mogħtija l-ħlewwa
nl: Kastanjepasta's, Kastanjepasta
pl: Słodzony przecier z kasztanów
pt: Creme de castanha
ro: Piureul de castane îndulcit
sk: Sladené gaštanové pyré
sl: Sladkana kostanjeva kaša
sv: Sötad kastanjepuré

en: Vanilla flavoured chestnut cream, Canned vanilla flavoured chestnut cream
fr: Crème de marrons vanillée, Crème de marrons à la vanille, Crème de marrons vanillée appertisée, Crème de marrons à la vanille en conserve

en: bilberries spreads
hr: namaz borovnica